browser/locales/l10n/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX pB Y 49
SFX pB ouloir ouloir/n'q'd'l'm't's' vouloir po:infi
SFX pB ouloir oulant/n'q'd'l'm't's' vouloir po:ppre
SFX pB ouloir oulu/L'D'Q' vouloir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pB ouloir oulus/D'Q' vouloir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pB ouloir oulue/L'D'Q' vouloir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pB ouloir oulues/D'Q' vouloir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pB ouloir eux/j'n'q'l'm't' vouloir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir eut/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir oulons/n'q'l't' vouloir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir oulez/n'q'l'm' vouloir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir eulent/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:ipre po:3pl!
SFX pB ouloir oulais/j'n'q'l'm't' vouloir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir oulait/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir oulions/n'q'l't' vouloir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir ouliez/n'q'l'm' vouloir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir oulaient/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pB ouloir oulus/j'n'q'l'm't' vouloir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir oulut/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir oulûmes/n'q'l't' vouloir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir oulûtes/n'q'l'm' vouloir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir oulurent/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pB ouloir oudrai/j'n'q'l'm't' vouloir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pB ouloir oudras/n'q'l'm't' vouloir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir oudra/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir oudrons/n'q'l't' vouloir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir oudrez/n'q'l'm' vouloir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir oudront/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pB ouloir oudrais/j'n'q'l'm't' vouloir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir oudrait/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:cond po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir oudrions/n'q'l't' vouloir po:cond po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir oudriez/n'q'l'm' vouloir po:cond po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir oudraient/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:cond po:3pl
SFX pB ouloir euille/j'n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir euillé/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:spre po:1isg
SFX pB ouloir euillè/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:spre po:1isg
SFX pB ouloir euilles/n'q'l'm't' vouloir po:spre po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir euillent/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:spre po:3pl
SFX pB ouloir oulusse/j'n'q'l'm't' vouloir po:simp po:1sg
SFX pB ouloir oulusses/n'q'l'm't' vouloir po:simp po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir oulût/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:simp po:3sg
SFX pB ouloir oulussions/n'q'l't' vouloir po:simp po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir oulussiez/n'q'l'm' vouloir po:simp po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir oulussent/n'q'l'm't's' vouloir po:simp po:3pl
SFX pB ouloir euille/n'l'm't' vouloir po:impe po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir eux/n'l'm't' vouloir po:impe po:2sg
SFX pB ouloir euillons/n'l't' vouloir po:impe po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir oulons/n'l't' vouloir po:impe po:1pl
SFX pB ouloir euillez/n'l'm' vouloir po:impe po:2pl
SFX pB ouloir oulez/n'l'm' vouloir po:impe po:2pl

SFX pC Y 46
SFX pC evoir evoir/n'q'd'l'm't's' devoir po:infi
SFX pC evoir evant/n'q'd'l'm't's' devoir po:ppre
SFX pC evoir û/d'q' redevoir po:ppas po:adj is:epi is:inv
SFX pC evoir u/d'q' redevoir po:ppas po:adj is:epi is:inv
SFX pC evoir us/d'q' devoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pC evoir ue/d'q' devoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pC evoir ues/d'q' devoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pC evoir ois/j'n'q'l'm't' devoir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pC evoir oit/c'n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pC evoir evons/n'q'l't' devoir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pC evoir evez/n'q'l'm' devoir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pC evoir oivent/n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX pC evoir evais/j'n'q'l'm't' devoir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pC evoir evait/c'n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pC evoir evions/n'q'l't' devoir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pC evoir eviez/n'q'l'm' devoir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pC evoir evaient/n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pC evoir us/j'n'q'l'm't' devoir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pC evoir ut/c'n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pC evoir ûmes/n'q'l't' devoir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pC evoir ûtes/n'q'l'm' devoir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pC evoir urent/n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pC evoir evrai/j'n'q'l'm't' devoir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pC evoir evras/n'q'l'm't' devoir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pC evoir evra/c'n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pC evoir evrons/n'q'l't' devoir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pC evoir evrez/n'q'l'm' devoir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pC evoir evront/n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pC evoir evrais/j'n'q'l'm't' devoir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pC evoir evrait/c'n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:cond po:3sg
SFX pC evoir evrions/n'q'l't' devoir po:cond po:1pl
SFX pC evoir evriez/n'q'l'm' devoir po:cond po:2pl
SFX pC evoir evraient/n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:cond po:3pl
SFX pC evoir oive/j'c'n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pC evoir oives/n'q'l'm't' devoir po:spre po:2sg
SFX pC evoir usse/j'n'q'l'm't' devoir po:simp po:1sg
SFX pC evoir ussé/n'q'l'm't' devoir po:simp po:1isg
SFX pC evoir ussè/n'q'l'm't' devoir po:simp po:1isg
SFX pC evoir usses/n'q'l'm't' devoir po:simp po:2sg
SFX pC evoir ût/c'n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:simp po:3sg
SFX pC evoir ussions/n'q'l't' devoir po:simp po:1pl
SFX pC evoir ussiez/n'q'l'm' devoir po:simp po:2pl
SFX pC evoir ussent/n'q'l'm't's' devoir po:simp po:3pl
SFX pC evoir ois/n'l'm't' devoir po:impe po:2sg
SFX pC evoir evons/n'l't' devoir po:impe po:1pl
SFX pC evoir evez/n'l'm' devoir po:impe po:2pl

SFX pD Y 1
SFX pD evoir û devoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg

SFX pE Y 46
SFX pE avoir avoir/n'q'd'l'm't's' savoir po:infi
SFX pE avoir achant/n'q'd'l'm't's' savoir po:ppre
SFX pE avoir u/L'D'Q' savoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pE avoir us/D'Q' savoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pE avoir ue/L'D'Q' savoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pE avoir ues/D'Q' savoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pE avoir ais/j'n'q'l'm't' savoir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pE avoir ait/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pE avoir avons/n'q'l't' savoir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pE avoir avez/n'q'l'm' savoir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pE avoir avent/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:ipre po:3pl!
SFX pE avoir avais/j'n'q'l'm't' savoir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pE avoir avait/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pE avoir avions/n'q'l't' savoir po:iimp po:1pl
SFX pE avoir aviez/n'q'l'm' savoir po:iimp po:2pl
SFX pE avoir avaient/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pE avoir us/j'n'q'l'm't' savoir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pE avoir ut/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pE avoir ûmes/n'q'l't' savoir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pE avoir ûtes/n'q'l'm' savoir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pE avoir urent/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pE avoir aurai/j'n'q'l'm't' savoir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pE avoir auras/n'q'l'm't' savoir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pE avoir aura/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pE avoir aurons/n'q'l't' savoir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pE avoir aurez/n'q'l'm' savoir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pE avoir auront/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pE avoir aurais/j'n'q'l'm't' savoir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pE avoir aurait/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:cond po:3sg
SFX pE avoir aurions/n'q'l't' savoir po:cond po:1pl
SFX pE avoir auriez/n'q'l'm' savoir po:cond po:2pl
SFX pE avoir auraient/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:cond po:3pl
SFX pE avoir ache/j'n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pE avoir aches/n'q'l'm't' savoir po:spre po:2sg
SFX pE avoir achions/n'q'l't' savoir po:spre po:1pl
SFX pE avoir achiez/n'q'l'm' savoir po:spre po:2pl
SFX pE avoir achent/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:spre po:3pl
SFX pE avoir usse/j'n'q'l'm't' savoir po:simp po:1sg
SFX pE avoir usses/n'q'l'm't' savoir po:simp po:2sg
SFX pE avoir ût/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:simp po:3sg
SFX pE avoir ussions/n'q'l't' savoir po:simp po:1pl
SFX pE avoir ussiez/n'q'l'm' savoir po:simp po:2pl
SFX pE avoir ussent/n'q'l'm't's' savoir po:simp po:3pl
SFX pE avoir ache/n'l'm't' savoir po:impe po:2sg
SFX pE avoir achons/n'l't' savoir po:impe po:1pl
SFX pE avoir achez/n'l'm' savoir po:impe po:2pl
