browser/locales/l10n/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.dic
devoir/pCpD() po:v3__tnq__a
redevoir/pC() po:v3__t____a
revouloir/pB() po:v3__tne__a
savoir/pE() po:v3_it_q__a
vouloir/pB() po:v3_itne__a
